Vermont, session 2025-2026, S153.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Extreme Temperature Worker Protection Act.”
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. chapter 3, subchapter 5A is added to read:
Subchapter 5A. Extreme Temperature Worker Protection
§ 240. PURPOSE
(a) Thousands of workers become sick from occupational exposure to
extreme hot and cold temperatures each year, many of whom die.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 2 of 18
(b) Nearly three out of four workers who die from exposure to extreme
temperatures in the workplace die in the first week of their employment before
they have had an opportunity to acclimatize to the conditions.
(c) Employers are required to provide workplaces free of known health and
safety hazards, and this includes protecting employees from temperature-
related hazards.
§ 240a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Acclimatization” means the body’s adaption to work in the heat as
a person is exposed to heat gradually over time, which reduces the strain
caused by heat stress and enables a person to work with less chance of heat
illness or injury.
(2) “Ambient temperature” means the temperature of the air surrounding
a body.
(3) “Cold-related injuries and illnesses” include chilblains, frostbite,
trench foot, and hypothermia. Symptoms of chilblains include redness,
itching, blistering, inflammation, and possible ulceration in severe cases.
Symptoms of frostbite include numbness, tingling or stinging, aching, and
bluish or pale, waxy skin. Symptoms of trench foot include reddening of the
skin, numbness, leg cramps, swelling, tingling pain, blisters or ulcers, bleeding
under the skin, and discoloration of the foot due to gangrene. Early symptoms
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 3 of 18
of hypothermia include shivering, fatigue, loss of coordination, confusion, and
disorientation. Late symptoms of hypothermia include no shivering, blue skin,
dilated pupils, slowed pulse and breathing, and loss of consciousness.
(4) “Employee” means any person engaged in service to an employer for
wages, salary, or other compensation, as well as individuals employed on the
worksite through a staffing agency, contractor, subcontractor, or delivery
service.
(5) “Employer” means a natural person, corporation, partnership, trust,
society, club, association, or other organization, including municipalities, the
State, and its instrumentalities.
(6) “Heat-related injuries and illnesses” include heat cramps, heat
exhaustion, heat syncope, and heat stroke.
(7) “Indoor” and “indoors” mean an area under a ceiling or overhead
covering that restricts airflow and has along its entire perimeter walls, doors,
windows, dividers, or other physical barriers that restrict airflow, whether open
or closed.
(8) “Outdoor” and “outdoors” mean an area that is not indoors.
(9) “Signs and symptoms of a heat emergency” include loss of
consciousness with excessive body temperature, which may or may not be
accompanied by vertigo, nausea, headache, cerebral dysfunction, or bizarre
behavior. A heat emergency could also include staggering, vomiting, acting
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 4 of 18
irrationally or disoriented, having convulsions, and continuing to have an
elevated heart rate despite resting.
(10) “Signs and symptoms of heat-related illness” include headache,
nausea, weakness, dizziness, elevated body temperature, muscle cramps, and
muscle pain or spasms.
(11) “Wet bulb globe temperature” means a heat metric that considers
ambient temperature, humidity, radiant heat from sunlight or artificial heat
sources, and air movement.
(12) “Work vehicle” means a car, truck, van, or other authorized means
of transporting vehicles or goods.
§ 240b. APPLICATION
(a) This subchapter shall apply with respect to all employers, employees,
and employment in or at a workplace in the State of Vermont, except it shall
not apply to the following:
(1) work activities for which there is no reasonable expectation of
exposure at or above a wet bulb globe temperature of 80 degrees Fahrenheit or
a temperature below 60 degrees Fahrenheit;
(2) short duration employee exposures at or above 80 degrees
Fahrenheit or below 60 degrees Fahrenheit of 15 minutes or less in any 60-
minute period;
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 5 of 18
(3) organizations whose primary function is the performance of
firefighting or any emergency response activity already covered by State or
federal law or regulation;
(4) work activities performed in indoor work areas or work vehicles
where air-conditioning and heating systems consistently keep the ambient
temperature below 80 degrees Fahrenheit and above 60 degrees Fahrenheit;
(5) work performed from the employee’s home or another remote
location of the employee’s choosing; and
(6) sedentary work activities at indoor work areas that only involve
some combination of the following: sitting, occasional standing and walking
for brief periods or time, and occasional lifting of objects weighing less than
10 pounds.
(b) This subchapter shall not apply to employers whose employees all
exclusively perform activities described in subdivisions (a)(1) through (6) of
this section.
§ 240c. EXTREME TEMPERATURE PREVENTION PLAN
(a) Employers must display a thermometer at each indoor and outdoor
worksite and in work vehicles to monitor the temperature. A thermometer that
measures the wet bulb globe temperature must be used when the workplace is
expected to be hot.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 6 of 18
(b) Employers must develop a written extreme temperature injury and
illness prevention plan with work-site-specific information. The plan must
include:
(1) a comprehensive list of the types of work activities covered by the
plan, information about the factors that can increase the likelihood of injury or
illness resulting from exposure to extreme temperatures in performing those
activities, and actions to be taken to reduce the likelihood of injury or illness;
(2) all policies and procedures necessary to comply with the
requirements of this subchapter;
(3) information on education and training; and
(4) emergency response procedures and contact information.
(c) The plan must be updated at least annually and whenever there is a
major change to work conditions. In addition, the effectiveness of the plan
must be evaluated and updated if necessary whenever a temperature-related
injury or illness results in death, medical treatment beyond first aid, absence
from work for several days, or loss of consciousness.
(d) The plan must be readily available to employees at each worksite.
§ 240d. HEAT INJURY AND ILLNESS PREVENTION
(a) The following steps shall be taken when the wet bulb globe temperature
at a worksite exceeds 80 degrees Fahrenheit:
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 7 of 18
(1) The employer must provide an effective means of communication so
that employees can contact a supervisor when necessary to address concerns
about temperature-related working conditions and signs and symptoms of heat-
related illness or a heat emergency.
(2) The employer must provide access to potable water for drinking that
is:
(A) placed in locations readily accessible to the employee;
(B) suitably cool; and
(C) of sufficient quantity to provide access to one quart of drinking
water per employee per hour.
(3) The employer must provide an area where employees working
outdoors can take breaks sufficient in size to accommodate the number of
employees on break and provides:
(A) natural shade, such as from trees, or artificial shade, such as a
tent or pavilion, that is open to the outside air and blocks direct sunlight; or
(B) air-conditioning, such as in a building, trailer, or vehicle.
(4) For indoor worksites, the employer must provide a break area that:
(A) is air-conditioned or has increased air movement and, if
appropriate, dehumidification;
(B) can accommodate the number of employees on break; and
(C) is readily accessible.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 8 of 18
(5) The employer must encourage employees to request preventative
cool-down breaks of not less than 10 minutes as needed. Employees who take
preventative cool-down breaks shall be monitored for symptoms of heat illness
and a heat emergency. If an employee exhibits signs or symptoms of heat-
related illness or a heat emergency, the employer shall provide appropriate first
aid or emergency response. Employees shall be encouraged to remain in the
cool-down area until any signs or symptoms of heat-related illness have
abated. If the preventative rest period coincides with an unpaid meal break, the
rest period will be considered a compensable work assignment.
(6) If the employer provides personal protective equipment to cool
employees, the employer must ensure the cooling properties of the equipment
are maintained at all times during use.
(7) Employers must provide work vehicles with functioning air-
conditioning that controls the temperature below 80 degrees Fahrenheit to
employees who spend more than 60 continuous minutes in a vehicle or whose
worksite is a vehicle.
(8) Employers must implement an acclimatization protocol for
employees new to the worksite and employees returning to the worksite
following an absence from work of more than 14 days. New and returning
employees shall be closely observed for signs and symptoms of heat-related
illness.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 9 of 18
(A) The acclimatization protocol for new employees gradually
increases the duration of work so that the employee’s exposure to temperatures
above 80 degrees Fahrenheit is restricted to not more than:
(i) 20 percent of a normal work shift exposure duration on the first
day;
(ii) 40 percent on the second day of work;
(iii) 60 percent on the third day of work; and
(iv) 80 percent on the fourth day of work.
(B) The acclimatization protocol for returning employees gradually
increases the duration of work so that the employee’s exposure to temperatures
above 80 degrees Fahrenheit is restricted to not more than:
(i) 50 percent of a normal work shift exposure duration on the first
day;
(ii) 60 percent on the second day of work; and
(iii) 80 percent on the third day of work.
(b) When the wet bulb globe temperature at a worksite exceeds 90 degrees
Fahrenheit, in addition to the steps required by subsection (a) of this section,
the employer must provide employees with at least a 15-minute paid rest break
every two hours in the cool-down break area. If the rest period coincides with
an unpaid meal break, the rest period will be considered a compensable work
assignment.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 10 of 18
(c) When the wet bulb globe temperature at a worksite exceeds 100 degrees
Fahrenheit, in addition to the steps required by subsection (a) of this section,
the employer must provide employees with at least a 10-minute paid rest break
every hour in the cool-down break area. If the rest period coincides with an
unpaid meal break, the rest period will be considered a compensable work
assignment.
(d) Employees taking a preventative cool-down break pursuant to
subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be closely observed for signs and
symptoms of heat-related illness or a heat emergency by one of the following
methods:
(1) a mandatory buddy system in which co-workers observe each other;
(2) observation by a supervisor or designated observer, with not more
than 20 employees observed by one individual; or
(3) effective two-way communication with employees who work alone
at a worksite with contact occurring at least every two hours.
(e) On days when the wet bulb globe temperature at a worksite is forecast
to exceed 90 degrees Fahrenheit, the employer must notify employees of the
following:
(1) the importance of drinking plenty of water;
(2) the employee’s right to take rest breaks if needed and as required by
this section;
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 11 of 18
(3) the signs and symptoms of heat-related illness and of a heat
emergency;
(4) how to seek help, including contact information for supervisors and
emergency medical personnel, and the procedures to be followed in an
emergency; and
(5) for mobile worksites, the location of break areas and drinking water.
§ 240e. COLD INJURY AND ILLNESS PREVENTION
(a) The following steps shall be taken when the temperature at a worksite
falls below 60 degrees Fahrenheit:
(1) The employer must provide an effective means of communication so
that employees can contact a supervisor when necessary to address concerns
about temperature-related working conditions and signs and symptoms of cold-
related injuries and illness.
(2) The employer must provide access to potable water for drinking that
is:
(A) placed in locations readily accessible to the employee;
(B) suitably cool; and
(C) of sufficient quantity to provide access to one quart of drinking
water per employee per hour.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 12 of 18
(3) The employer must provide an area where employees working
indoors and outdoors can take breaks sufficient in size to accommodate the
number of employees on break and provides access to:
(A) a warm and draft-free setting;
(B) warm beverages; and
(C) a place to change out of wet clothes.
(4) The employer must encourage employees to request preventative
warm-up breaks of not less than 10 minutes as needed. Employees who take
preventative warm-up breaks shall be monitored for symptoms of cold-related
illness and risk factors for cold stress. Risk factors for cold stress include wet
or damp clothing, inadequate clothing, and exhaustion. If an employee
exhibits signs or symptoms of cold-related illness, the employer shall provide
appropriate first aid or emergency response. Employees shall be encouraged to
remain in the warm-up area until any signs or symptoms of cold-related illness
have abated. If the preventative rest period coincides with an unpaid meal
break, the rest period will be considered a compensable work assignment.
(5) Employers must provide work vehicles with functioning heating that
controls the temperature above 60 degrees Fahrenheit to employees who spend
more than 60 continuous minutes in a vehicle or whose worksite is a vehicle.
(b) When the temperature at a worksite drops below 40 degrees Fahrenheit,
in addition to the steps required by subsection (a) of this section:
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 13 of 18
(1) The employer must provide employees with at least a 15-minute rest
break every two hours in the warm-up break area. If the rest period coincides
with an unpaid meal break, the rest period will be considered a compensable
work assignment.
(2) The employer must provide suitable personal protective equipment
to the employee to protect the employee’s ears, face, hands, and feet. If the
employee’s skin, clothing, or personal protective equipment is wet, the
employee must be immediately removed from the worksite, taken to a warm-
up area, and not return to the worksite until the wet items have dried or been
replaced. In considering the necessary protective equipment, employers must
take into account the risk factors for an employee’s heat load when wearing
personal protective equipment in cold temperatures.
(c) Employees taking a warm-up break pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section shall be closely observed for signs and symptoms of cold-related illness
and risk factors for cold stress by one of the following methods:
(1) a mandatory buddy system in which co-workers observe each other;
(2) observation by a supervisor or designated observer, with not more
than 20 employees observed by one individual; or
(3) effective two-way communication with employees who work alone
at a worksite with contact occurring at least every two hours.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 14 of 18
(d) On days when the temperature at a worksite is forecast to be below 30
degrees Fahrenheit, the employer must notify employees of the following:
(1) the employees’ right to take rest breaks if needed and as required by
this section;
(2) the signs and symptoms of cold-related illness;
(3) how to seek help, including contact information for supervisors and
emergency medical personnel, and the procedures to be followed in an
emergency; and
(4) for mobile worksites, the location of break areas and drinking water.
§ 240f. EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLAN
(a) The employer must develop and implement an emergency response plan
that includes:
(1) a list of emergency phone numbers;
(2) a description of how employees can contact a supervisor and
emergency medical services;
(3) a description of how to transport employees to a place where they
can be reached by an emergency medical provider;
(4) clear and precise directions to the worksite to be provided to an
emergency dispatcher; and
(5) procedures for responding to an employee experiencing signs and
symptoms of heat-related or cold-related illness.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 15 of 18
(b) If an employee is experiencing signs and symptoms of heat-related or
cold-related illness, the employer must:
(1) relieve the employee from duty;
(2) monitor the employee;
(3) ensure the employee is not left alone; and
(4) offer first aid or medical services on-site.
(c) If an employee is experiencing a heat-related or cold-related emergency,
in addition to the actions set forth in subsection (b) of this section, the
employer must:
(1) take immediate action to reduce the employee’s body temperature in
a heat emergency or increase the employee’s body temperature in a cold
emergency before emergency medical services arrive; and
(2) contact emergency medical services immediately.
(d) Employees receiving first aid or medical services shall be considered to
be on duty for compensation purposes.
§ 240g. EDUCATION AND TRAINING
(a) The employer must provide an effective education and training program
at no cost to employees that covers:
(1) temperature-related injuries and illnesses, including symptoms and
signs of each;
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 16 of 18
(2) risk factors for temperature-related injuries, including the
contributions of physical exertion, clothing, personal protective equipment, a
lack of acclimatization, and personal risk factors, such as age, health, alcohol
consumption, and use of certain medications;
(3) the importance of removing personal protective equipment that may
impair cooling during rest breaks in hot weather and wet or damp equipment in
cold weather;
(4) the importance of taking preventative rest breaks;
(5) the importance of drinking water and staying hydrated;
(6) the location of break areas and employer-provided water;
(7) the importance of reporting any signs and symptoms of temperature-
related illness the employee experiences or observes in co-workers;
(8) the employer’s emergency response plan;
(9) how to access the employer’s extreme temperature protection plan;
and
(10) the employee’s right to the protections of this subchapter, including
protection from retaliation for exercising those rights.
(b) The training shall be provided to new employees upon hire and to all
employees at least annually. The training materials shall be available to
employees upon request.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 17 of 18
(c) Supplemental training shall be provided whenever:
(1) an employee’s job duties change, affecting the employee’s exposure
to heat or cold;
(2) the employer’s policies or procedures change;
(3) there is an indication that an employee has not retained the necessary
information; or
(4) there is an anticipated heat wave or significant drop in temperature.
(d) The employer must ensure that each supervisor responsible for
supervising employees exposed to extreme temperatures in the workplace
receives training on and understands:
(1) the topics outlined in subsection (a) of this section;
(2) the employer’s policies and procedures for monitoring temperature
and humidity conditions and adjusting work protocols as necessary; and
(3) the procedures to be followed if an employee exhibits signs and
symptoms of a heat-related or cold-related illness.
(e) The training must be provided in a language and at a literacy level that
each employee understands, and employees must be given the opportunity to
ask questions and receive answers about the training.
(f) Employers are encouraged to solicit input from employees on
administrative controls and engineering controls that could be implemented to
limit exposure to temperature-related hazards in the workplace.
VT LEG #382538 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.153
2025 Page 18 of 18
§ 240h. EMPLOYEE RIGHTS
The provisions against discharge and retaliation in section 231 of this title
and the private right of action in section 232 of this title shall apply to this
subchapter.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on May 1, 2027.
VT LEG #382538 v.1